Illinois, session 104th, HB2352.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Governmental Account Audit Act is amended 5by changing Sections 1, 3, and 6 as follows: 6    (50 ILCS 310/1)  (from Ch. 85, par. 701)7    Sec. 1. Definitions. As used in this Act, unless the 8context otherwise indicates:9    "Governmental unit" or "unit" includes all municipal 10corporations in and political subdivisions of this State that 11appropriate more than $5,000 for a fiscal year, with the 12amount to increase or decrease by the amount of the Consumer 13Price Index (CPI) as reported on January 1 of each year, except 14the following:15        (1) School districts.16        (2) Cities, villages, and incorporated towns subject 17    to the Municipal Auditing Law, as contained in the 18    Illinois Municipal Code, and cities that file a report 19    with the Comptroller under Section 3.1-35-115 of the 20    Illinois Municipal Code.21        (3) Counties with a population of 1,000,000 or more.22        (4) Counties subject to the County Auditing Law.23        (5) Any other municipal corporations in or political   HB2352- 2 -LRB104 07611 RTM 17655 b1    subdivisions of this State, the accounts of which are 2    required by law to be audited by or under the direction of 3    the Auditor General.4        (6) (Blank).5        (7) A drainage district, established under the 6    Illinois Drainage Code (70 ILCS 605), that did not receive 7    or expend any moneys during the immediately preceding 8    fiscal year or obtains approval for assessments and 9    expenditures through the circuit court.10        (8) Public housing authorities that submit financial 11    reports to the U.S. Department of Housing and Urban 12    Development.13    "Governing body" means the board or other body or officers 14having authority to levy taxes, make appropriations, authorize 15the expenditure of public funds or approve claims for any 16governmental unit.17    "Comptroller" means the Comptroller of the State of 18Illinois.19    "Consumer Price Index" means the Consumer Price Index for 20All Urban Consumers for all items published by the United 21States Department of Labor.22    "Audit report" means the written report of the auditor and 23all appended statements and schedules relating to that report, 24presenting or recording the findings of an examination or 25audit of the financial transactions, affairs, or conditions of 26a governmental unit.  HB2352- 3 -LRB104 07611 RTM 17655 b1    "Auditor" means a licensed certified public accountant, as 2that term is defined in Section 0.03 of the Illinois Public 3Accounting Act, or the substantial equivalent of a licensed 4CPA, as provided under Section 5.2 of the Illinois Public 5Accounting Act, who performs an audit of governmental unit 6financial statements and records and expresses an assurance or 7disclaims an opinion on the audited financial statements. 8    "Report" includes both audit reports and reports filed 9instead of an audit report by a governmental unit receiving 10revenue of less than $1,500,000 $850,000 during any fiscal 11year to which the reports relate.12    "Generally accepted accounting principles" means 13accounting principles generally accepted in the United States. 14    "Generally accepted auditing standards" means auditing 15standards generally accepted in the United States. 16(Source: P.A. 100-837, eff. 8-13-18; 101-419, eff. 1-1-20.) 17    (50 ILCS 310/3)  (from Ch. 85, par. 703)18    Sec. 3. Any governmental unit receiving revenue of less 19than $1,500,000 $850,000 for any fiscal year shall, in lieu of 20complying with the requirements of Section 2 for audits and 21audit reports, beginning with fiscal year 2016, either: (i) 22cause an audit of the accounts of the unit to be made once 23every 4 years and file with the Comptroller an annual 24financial report containing information required by the 25Comptroller, or (ii) file with the Comptroller an annual   HB2352- 4 -LRB104 07611 RTM 17655 b1financial report containing information required by the 2Comptroller, a copy of which has been provided to each member 3of that governmental unit's board of elected officials, 4presented either in person or by a live phone or web connection 5during a public meeting, and approved by a 3/5 majority vote. 6In addition, a governmental unit receiving revenue of less 7than $1,500,000 $850,000 may file with the Comptroller any 8audit reports which may have been prepared under any other 9law. Any governmental unit receiving revenue of $1,500,000 10$850,000 or more for any fiscal year shall, in addition to 11complying with the requirements of Section 2 for audits and 12audit reports, file with the Comptroller the financial report 13required by this Section. Such financial reports shall be on 14forms so designed by the Comptroller as not to require 15professional accounting services for its preparation. All 16reports to be filed with the Comptroller under this Section 17must be submitted electronically and the Comptroller must post 18the reports on the Internet no later than 45 days after they 19are received. If the governmental unit provides the 20Comptroller's Office with sufficient evidence that the report 21cannot be filed electronically, the Comptroller may waive this 22requirement. The Comptroller must also post a list of 23governmental units that are not in compliance with the 24reporting requirements set forth in this Section. 25    Any financial report under this Section shall include the 26name of the purchasing agent who oversees all competitively   HB2352- 5 -LRB104 07611 RTM 17655 b1bid contracts. If there is no purchasing agent, the name of the 2person responsible for oversight of all competitively bid 3contracts shall be listed. 4(Source: P.A. 97-890, eff. 8-2-12; 97-1142, eff. 12-28-12; 598-1019, eff. 7-1-15.) 6    (50 ILCS 310/6)  (from Ch. 85, par. 706)7    Sec. 6. When the audit is completed the auditor making 8such audit shall make and sign at least 3 copies of the report 9of the audit and immediately file them with the governmental 10unit audited. Governmental units receiving revenue of 11$1,500,000 $850,000 or more for any fiscal year shall 12immediately make one copy of the audit report and one copy of 13the financial report required by Section 3 of this Act a part 14of its public record. Governmental units receiving revenue of 15less than $1,500,000 $850,000 shall immediately make one copy 16of the audit report, or one copy of the report authorized by 17Section 3 of this Act to be filed instead of the audit report, 18a part of its public record. These copies shall be open to 19public inspection. In addition, the governmental unit shall 20file one copy of the report with the Comptroller and with the 21county clerk of the county in which the principal office of the 22governmental unit is located. A governmental unit may, in 23filing its audit report with the Comptroller, transmit with 24such report any comment or explanation that it wishes to make 25concerning the report.  HB2352- 6 -LRB104 07611 RTM 17655 b1(Source: P.A. 101-419, eff. 1-1-20.) 2    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 3becoming law.